Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.010

Residence—Office—Bond—Oath.

The state auditor shall reside and keep his or her office at the seat of government. Before entering upon his or her duties he or she shall execute and deliver to the secretary of state a bond to the state in the sum of fifty thousand dollars, to be approved by the governor, conditioned for the faithful performance of all duties required by law. He or she shall take an oath of office before any person authorized to administer oaths, and file a copy thereof, together with the required bond, in the office of the secretary of state.

[ 1995 c 301 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.09.010. Prior: 1890 p 634 s 1; RRS s 10996; prior: Code 1881 s 2566; 1871 p 96 s 1; 1854 p 409 s 2.]